Illinois, session 104th, HB3212.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Local 5Government Bankruptcy Neutral Evaluation Act. 6    Section 2. Findings. Filing for Chapter 9 can reduce 7service levels to the taxpayers and residents of a local 8public entity. In some circumstances, it can have major 9short-term and long-term fiscal consequences for the entity, 10the surrounding entities, and the State. Filing for bankruptcy 11protection under Chapter 9 should be considered a last resort, 12to be instituted only after other reasonable efforts have been 13made to avoid a bankruptcy filing or otherwise appropriately 14plan for it. It is in the interest of the State, units of local 15government, and the public that local governmental entities 16have sufficiently sound financial capacity to provide required 17services to the public during any restructuring or financial 18reorganization process. Furthermore, it is in the best 19interest of the public, the State, and local governmental 20entities that employees, trade creditors, bondholders, and 21other interest holders be included in an appropriate 22restructuring process and have an adequate understanding of 23the financial capacity of local governmental entities and   HB3212- 2 -LRB104 10230 RTM 20304 b1their obligations, as a clear understanding of both is 2necessary for any restructuring or reorganization process.3    To the extent financial relief granted through Chapter 9 4can affect debt service payments, the bondholders have a 5direct interest in the Chapter 9 process, particularly prior 6to filing. Therefore, it is important for those parties to be 7able to participate in a prefiling confidential neutral 8evaluation process that could assist parties in reaching a 9settlement and avoiding a bankruptcy filing or otherwise lead 10to a pre-negotiated consensual plan of readjustment as clearly 11contemplated by subsection (c) of Section 109 of Title 11 of 12the United States Code.13    To the extent financial relief granted through Chapter 9 14could affect public employee compensation, employees have a 15direct interest in the Chapter 9 process, particularly prior 16to filing. Therefore, it is important for those parties to be 17able to participate in a prefiling confidential neutral 18evaluation process that could assist parties in reaching a 19settlement or otherwise lead to a pre-negotiated, consensual 20plan of adjustment and avoid a Chapter 9 filing.21    Given the connection between State allocations and local 22budgets, the State has a role in assisting local public 23entities to address potential insolvency with the goal of 24averting bankruptcy filings where possible and providing a 25process designed to make the debt restructuring process in or 26outside of a Chapter 9 bankruptcy as cost effective and   HB3212- 3 -LRB104 10230 RTM 20304 b1efficient as possible for all participants. 2    Illinois taxpayers who rely on public safety, senior, 3recreational, health, library, and other public services, as 4well as those who own and operate businesses in our 5communities, deserve every reasonable and appropriate effort 6that State and local government can make to avoid adverse 7consequences of Chapter 9 bankruptcy filings, particularly 8where a neutral evaluation may lead to the avoidance of 9Chapter 9 filing by an out-of-court resolution of outstanding 10obligations and disputes. 11    Resolving local and State business and financial issues in 12a timely, fair, and cost-effective manner is an integral part 13of a successful government and is in the public interest. It 14has long been recognized that alternative dispute resolution 15proceedings, like a neutral evaluation, offer an economical, 16discreet, and expeditious way to resolve potentially 17devastating situations. 18    Through the neutral evaluation process, the neutral 19evaluator, a specially trained, neutral third party, can 20assist the local public entity and its creditors and 21stakeholders to fully explore alternatives, while allowing the 22interested parties to exchange information in a confidential 23environment with the assistance and supervision of a neutral 24evaluator to determine whether the entity's contractual and 25financial obligations can be renegotiated on a consensual 26basis.    HB3212- 4 -LRB104 10230 RTM 20304 b1    Section 3. Definitions. As used in this Act:2    "Chapter 9" means Chapter 9 of Title 11 of the United 3States Code.4    "Creditor" means either of the following:5        A person or entity that has a noncontingent claim 6    against a local public entity that arose at the time of or 7    before the commencement of the neutral evaluation process 8    and whose claim represents at least $5,000,000 or 9    comprises more than 5% of the local public entity's debt 10    or obligations, whichever is less.11        A person or entity that would have a noncontingent 12    claim against the local public entity upon the rejection 13    of an executory contract or unexpired lease in a Chapter 9 14    case and whose claim would represent at least $5,000,000 15    or comprises more than 5% of the local public entity's 16    debt or obligations, whichever is less.17    "Debtor" means a local public entity that may file for 18bankruptcy under Chapter 9.19    "Good faith" means participation by a party in the neutral 20evaluation process with the intent to negotiate toward a 21resolution of the issues that are the subject of the neutral 22evaluation process, including the timely provision of complete 23and accurate information to provide the relevant parties 24through the neutral evaluation process with sufficient 25information, in a confidential manner, to negotiate the   HB3212- 5 -LRB104 10230 RTM 20304 b1readjustment of the local public entity's debt. 2    "Interested party" means a trustee, a committee of 3creditors, an affected creditor, an indenture trustee, a 4pension fund, a bondholder, a union that, under its collective 5bargaining agreements, has standing to initiate contract or 6debt restructuring negotiations with the local public entity, 7or a representative selected by an association of retired 8employees of the local public entity who receive income from 9the local public entity convening the neutral evaluation. A 10local public entity may invite holders of contingent claims to 11participate as interested parties in the neutral evaluation if 12the local public entity determines that the contingency is 13likely to occur and the claim may represent $5,000,000 or 14comprise more than 5% of the local public entity's debt or 15obligations, whichever is less. 16    "Local public entity" means any county, municipality, 17township, special district, public authority, public agency, 18unit of local government, school district, or any other entity 19that is a political subdivision or public agency or 20instrumentality of the State, or that qualifies as a debtor 21under any other federal bankruptcy law applicable to local 22public entities.23    "Local public entity representative" means the person or 24persons designated by the local public entity with authority 25to make recommendations and to attend the neutral evaluation 26on behalf of the governing body of the local public entity.   HB3212- 6 -LRB104 10230 RTM 20304 b1    "Neutral evaluation" is a form of non-binding alternative 2dispute resolution.  3    Section 5. Eligibility. A local public entity in this 4State may file a petition and exercise powers under applicable 5federal bankruptcy law if either of the following apply: (i) 6under Section 10, a neutral evaluation process has been 7initiated by the local public entity and has ended, or (ii) the 8local public entity declares a fiscal emergency and adopts a 9resolution by a majority vote of the governing board under 10Section 15. 11    Section 10. Neutral evaluation process.12    (a) A local public entity may initiate the neutral 13evaluation process if the local public entity is or likely 14will become unable to meet its financial obligations as and 15when those obligations are due or become due and owing. The 16local public entity shall initiate the neutral evaluation by 17providing notice by certified mail of a request for neutral 18evaluation to interested parties. 19    (b) Interested parties shall respond within 10 business 20days after receipt of notice of the local public entity's 21request for neutral evaluation.22    (c) The local public entity and the interested parties 23agreeing to participate in the neutral evaluation shall, 24through a mutually agreed upon process, select the neutral   HB3212- 7 -LRB104 10230 RTM 20304 b1evaluator to oversee the neutral evaluation process and 2facilitate all discussions in an effort to resolve their 3disputes.4    If the local public entity and interested parties fail to 5agree on a neutral evaluator within 7 days after the 6interested parties have responded to the notification sent by 7the local public entity, then the local public entity shall 8select 5 qualified neutral evaluators and provide their names, 9references, and backgrounds to the participating interested 10parties. Within 3 business days, a majority of participating 11interested parties may strike up to 4 names from the list. If a 12majority of participating interested parties strikes 4 names, 13then the remaining candidate shall be the neutral evaluator. 14If the majority of participating parties strikes fewer than 4 15names, the local public entity may choose which of the 16remaining candidates shall be the neutral evaluator. 17    (d) A neutral evaluator shall have experience and training 18in conflict resolution and alternative dispute resolution and 19shall meet at least one of the following qualifications:20        (1) at least 10 years of high-level business or legal 21    practice involving bankruptcy or service as a United 22    States Bankruptcy Judge; or23        (2) professional experience or training in local 24    government finance and one or more of the following areas: 25    local government organization, local government debt 26    restructuring, local government finances dispute   HB3212- 8 -LRB104 10230 RTM 20304 b1    resolution, Chapter 9 bankruptcy, public finance, 2    taxation, Illinois Constitutional law, Illinois labor law, 3    or federal labor law.4    (e) The neutral evaluator shall be impartial, objective, 5independent, and free from prejudice. The neutral evaluator 6shall not act with partiality or prejudice based on any 7participant's personal characteristics, background, values or 8beliefs, or performance during the neutral evaluation process.9    (f) The neutral evaluator shall avoid a conflict of 10interest or the appearance of a conflict of interest during 11the neutral evaluation process. The neutral evaluator shall 12make a reasonable inquiry to determine whether there are any 13facts that a reasonable individual would consider likely to 14create a potential or actual conflict of interest. 15Notwithstanding subsection (n) of this Section, if the neutral 16evaluator is informed of the existence of any facts that a 17reasonable individual would consider likely to create a 18potential or actual conflict of interest, the neutral 19evaluator shall disclose these facts in writing to the local 20public entity and all interested parties involved in the 21neutral evaluation. If any party to the neutral evaluation 22objects to the neutral evaluator, then that party shall notify 23all other parties to the neutral evaluation, including the 24neutral evaluator, within 15 days after receipt of the notice 25from the neutral evaluator, and the neutral evaluator shall 26withdraw and a new neutral evaluator shall be selected under   HB3212- 9 -LRB104 10230 RTM 20304 b1subsections (c) and (d) of this Section. 2    (g) Prior to the neutral evaluation process, the neutral 3evaluator shall not establish another relationship with any of 4the parties in a manner that would raise questions about the 5integrity of the neutral evaluation, except that the neutral 6evaluator may conduct further neutral evaluations regarding 7other potential local public entities that may involve some of 8the same or similar constituents to a prior mediation.9    (h) The neutral evaluator shall conduct the neutral 10evaluation process in a manner that promotes voluntary, 11uncoerced decision-making in which each party makes free and 12informed choices regarding the process and outcome. 13    (i) The neutral evaluator shall not impose a settlement on 14the parties. The neutral evaluator shall use his or her best 15efforts to assist the parties to reach a satisfactory 16resolution of their disputes. Subject to the discretion of the 17neutral evaluator, the neutral evaluator may make oral or 18written recommendations for settlement or plan of readjustment 19to a party privately or to all parties jointly. 20    (j) The neutral evaluator shall inform the local public 21entity and all parties of the provisions of Chapter 9 relative 22to other chapters of the Bankruptcy Code. This instruction 23shall highlight the limited authority of United States 24bankruptcy judges in Chapter 9. 25    (k) The neutral evaluator may request from the parties 26documentation and other information that the neutral evaluator   HB3212- 10 -LRB104 10230 RTM 20304 b1believes may be helpful in assisting the parties to address 2the obligations between them. This documentation may include 3the status of funds of the local public entity that clearly 4distinguishes between general funds and special funds, and the 5proposed plan of readjustment prepared by the local public 6entity. 7    (l) The neutral evaluator shall provide counsel and 8guidance to all parties, shall not be a legal representative 9of any party, and shall not have a fiduciary duty to any party. 10    (m) In the event of a settlement with all interested 11parties, the neutral evaluator may assist the parties in 12negotiating a pre-petitioned, pre-agreed plan of readjustment 13in connection with a potential Chapter 9 filing. 14    (n) If at any time during the neutral evaluation process 15the local public entity and a majority of the representatives 16of the interested parties participating in the neutral 17evaluation wish to remove the neutral evaluator, the local 18public entity or any interested party may make a request to the 19other interested parties to remove the neutral evaluator. If 20the local public entity and the majority of the interested 21parties agree that the neutral evaluator should be removed, 22the parties shall select a new neutral evaluator.23    (o) The local public entity and all interested parties 24participating in the neutral evaluation process shall 25negotiate in good faith. Failure to do so is grounds for ending 26the neutral evaluation process and satisfying the eligibility   HB3212- 11 -LRB104 10230 RTM 20304 b1requirements of item (i) of Section 5.2    (p) The local public entity and interested parties shall 3provide a representative of each party to attend all neutral 4evaluation sessions. Each representative shall have the 5authority to settle and resolve disputes or shall be in a 6position to present any proposed settlement or plan of 7readjustment to the parties participating in the neutral 8evaluation. 9    (q) The parties shall maintain the confidentiality of the 10neutral evaluation process and shall not disclose statements 11made, information disclosed, or documents prepared or 12produced, during the neutral evaluation process, at the 13conclusion of the neutral evaluation process or during any 14bankruptcy proceeding unless either of the following occur: 15        (i) all persons that conduct or otherwise participate 16    in the neutral evaluation expressly agree in writing to 17    disclosure of the communication, document, or writing; or 18        (ii) the information is deemed necessary by a judge 19    presiding over a bankruptcy proceeding under Chapter 9 of 20    Title 11 of the United States Code to determine 21    eligibility of a local public entity to proceed with a 22    bankruptcy proceeding under subsection (c) of Section 109 23    of Title 11 of the United States Code. 24    (r) The neutral evaluation established by this process 25shall not last for more than 60 days after the date the 26evaluator is selected, unless the local public entity or a   HB3212- 12 -LRB104 10230 RTM 20304 b1majority of participating interested parties elect to extend 2the process for up to 30 additional days. The neutral 3evaluation process shall not last for more than 90 days after 4the date the evaluator is selected unless the local public 5entity and a majority of the interested parties agree to an 6extension. 7    (s) The local public entity shall pay 50% of the costs of 8neutral evaluation, including, but not limited to, the fees of 9the evaluator, and the creditors shall pay the balance, unless 10otherwise agreed to by the parties. 11    (t) The neutral evaluation process shall end if any of the 12following occur: 13        (i) the parties execute a settlement agreement; 14        (ii) the parties reach an agreement or proposed plan 15    of readjustment that requires the approval of a bankruptcy 16    judge;17        (iii) the neutral evaluation process has exceeded the 18    later of (i) 60 days after the date the neutral evaluator 19    was selected, or (ii) 90 days after the initiation of the 20    neutral evaluation process by the local public entity 21    under subsection (a) of Section 10, the parties have not 22    reached an agreement, and the local public entity and a 23    majority of the interested parties do not agree to extend 24    the neutral evaluation process; 25        (iv) the local public entity initiated the neutral 26    evaluation process under subsection (a) of this Section   HB3212- 13 -LRB104 10230 RTM 20304 b1    and received no responses from interested parties within 2    the time specified in subsection (b) of this Section; or 3        (v) the fiscal condition of the local public entity 4    deteriorates to the point that a fiscal emergency is 5    declared under Section 15 and necessitates the need to 6    file a petition and exercise powers under applicable 7    federal bankruptcy law.      8    Section 15. Declaration of fiscal emergency. 9Notwithstanding any other Section of this Act, a local public 10entity may file a petition and exercise powers under 11applicable federal bankruptcy law, if the local public entity 12declares a fiscal emergency and adopts a resolution by a 13majority vote of the governing board at a noticed public 14hearing that includes findings that the financial state of the 15local public entity jeopardizes the health, safety, or 16well-being of the residents of the local public entity's 17jurisdiction or service area absent the protections of Chapter 189. The resolution shall make findings that the local public 19entity is or will be unable to pay its obligations within the 20next 60 days. Prior to a declaration of fiscal emergency and 21adoption of a resolution, the local public entity shall place 22an item on the agenda of a noticed public hearing on the fiscal 23condition of the local public entity to take public comment. 24The board of supervisors of a county that intends to take 25action under this Section and places a notice on an agenda   HB3212- 14 -LRB104 10230 RTM 20304 b1regarding a proposed resolution to declare a fiscal emergency 2may require local agencies with funds invested in the county 3treasury to provide a 5-day notice of withdrawal before the 4county is required to comply with a request for withdrawal of 5funds by that local agency.  6    Section 20. Liabilities. This Act shall not impose any 7liability or responsibility, in law or equity, upon the State, 8any department, agency, or other entity of the State, or any 9officer or employee of the State, for any action taken by any 10local public entity under this Act, for any violation of the 11provisions of this Act by any local public entity, or for any 12failure to comply with the provisions of this Act by any local 13public entity. No action against the State, or any department, 14agency, entity of the State, or any officer or employee of the 15State acting in their official capacity may be maintained for 16any activity authorized by this Act, or for the act of a local 17public entity filing under Chapter 9 of Title 11 of the United 18States Code, including any proceeding following a local public 19entity's filing.  20    Section 25. Confidential Information. All records, 21including without limitation all reports, writings, letters, 22memoranda, and other documentary materials, that are prepared 23for or used in connection with the neutral evaluation process, 24the filing of a federal bankruptcy petition, or other actions   HB3212- 15 -LRB104 10230 RTM 20304 b1taken by a local public entity or a neutral evaluator under 2this Act are exempt from disclosure, inspection, and copying 3under the Freedom of Information Act. 4    Section 30. Statutory lien for bonds. 5    (a) As used in this Section:6    "Bond" or "bonds" has the same meaning given to that term 7under Section 3 of the Local Government Debt Reform Act.8    "Statutory lien" shall have the meaning given to that term 9under Section 101(53) of the federal Bankruptcy Code.10    (b) All bonds, including general obligation bonds and 11revenue bonds issued and sold under the Local Government Debt 12Reform Act or related laws, including bonds issued under home 13rule powers, issued by a local public entity shall be secured 14by a statutory lien on all revenues received pursuant to the 15levy and collection of tax or the collection or deposit of 16money, funds, or revenues so pledged to the payment of the 17bonds. The statutory lien shall automatically attach from the 18time such pledge is made without further action or 19authorization by the governing authority of the local public 20entity. The statutory lien shall be valid and binding from the 21time the bonds are executed and delivered without any physical 22delivery thereof or further act required, and shall be a first 23priority lien, unless the bonds so otherwise provide.24    The revenues received pursuant to the levy and collection 25of the taxes or the collection or deposit of revenues, money,   HB3212- 16 -LRB104 10230 RTM 20304 b1or funds so pledged shall be immediately subject to the 2statutory lien, and the statutory lien shall automatically 3attach to the revenues and be effective, binding, and 4enforceable against the local public entity or its successors, 5transferees, and creditors, and all others asserting rights 6therein or having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or 7otherwise against the local public entity, irrespective of 8whether those parties have notice of the lien and without the 9need for any physical delivery, recordation, filing, or 10further act. In addition, revenue bonds issued by a local 11public entity under the Local Government Debt Reform Act or 12related laws, including bonds issued by a local public entity 13with home rule authority, shall have all of the protection 14afforded to special revenue under Chapter 9, to the extent 15applicable. 16    Section 80. The Open Meetings Act is amended by changing 17Section 2 as follows: 18    (5 ILCS 120/2)  (from Ch. 102, par. 42)19    Sec. 2. Open meetings. 20    (a) Openness required. All meetings of public bodies shall 21be open to the public unless excepted in subsection (c) and 22closed in accordance with Section 2a.23    (b) Construction of exceptions. The exceptions contained 24in subsection (c) are in derogation of the requirement that   HB3212- 17 -LRB104 10230 RTM 20304 b1public bodies meet in the open, and therefore, the exceptions 2are to be strictly construed, extending only to subjects 3clearly within their scope. The exceptions authorize but do 4not require the holding of a closed meeting to discuss a 5subject included within an enumerated exception.6    (c) Exceptions. A public body may hold closed meetings to 7consider the following subjects:8        (1) The appointment, employment, compensation, 9    discipline, performance, or dismissal of specific 10    employees, specific individuals who serve as independent 11    contractors in a park, recreational, or educational 12    setting, or specific volunteers of the public body or 13    legal counsel for the public body, including hearing 14    testimony on a complaint lodged against an employee, a 15    specific individual who serves as an independent 16    contractor in a park, recreational, or educational 17    setting, or a volunteer of the public body or against 18    legal counsel for the public body to determine its 19    validity. However, a meeting to consider an increase in 20    compensation to a specific employee of a public body that 21    is subject to the Local Government Wage Increase 22    Transparency Act may not be closed and shall be open to the 23    public and posted and held in accordance with this Act.24        (2) Collective negotiating matters between the public 25    body and its employees or their representatives, or 26    deliberations concerning salary schedules for one or more   HB3212- 18 -LRB104 10230 RTM 20304 b1    classes of employees.2        (3) The selection of a person to fill a public office, 3    as defined in this Act, including a vacancy in a public 4    office, when the public body is given power to appoint 5    under law or ordinance, or the discipline, performance or 6    removal of the occupant of a public office, when the 7    public body is given power to remove the occupant under 8    law or ordinance. 9        (4) Evidence or testimony presented in open hearing, 10    or in closed hearing where specifically authorized by law, 11    to a quasi-adjudicative body, as defined in this Act, 12    provided that the body prepares and makes available for 13    public inspection a written decision setting forth its 14    determinative reasoning.15        (4.5) Evidence or testimony presented to a school 16    board regarding denial of admission to school events or 17    property pursuant to Section 24-24 of the School Code, 18    provided that the school board prepares and makes 19    available for public inspection a written decision setting 20    forth its determinative reasoning. 21        (5) The purchase or lease of real property for the use 22    of the public body, including meetings held for the 23    purpose of discussing whether a particular parcel should 24    be acquired.25        (6) The setting of a price for sale or lease of 26    property owned by the public body.  HB3212- 19 -LRB104 10230 RTM 20304 b1        (7) The sale or purchase of securities, investments, 2    or investment contracts. This exception shall not apply to 3    the investment of assets or income of funds deposited into 4    the Illinois Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund. 5        (8) Security procedures, school building safety and 6    security, and the use of personnel and equipment to 7    respond to an actual, a threatened, or a reasonably 8    potential danger to the safety of employees, students, 9    staff, the public, or public property.10        (9) Student disciplinary cases.11        (10) The placement of individual students in special 12    education programs and other matters relating to 13    individual students.14        (11) Litigation, when an action against, affecting or 15    on behalf of the particular public body has been filed and 16    is pending before a court or administrative tribunal, or 17    when the public body finds that an action is probable or 18    imminent, in which case the basis for the finding shall be 19    recorded and entered into the minutes of the closed 20    meeting.21        (12) The establishment of reserves or settlement of 22    claims as provided in the Local Governmental and 23    Governmental Employees Tort Immunity Act, if otherwise the 24    disposition of a claim or potential claim might be 25    prejudiced, or the review or discussion of claims, loss or 26    risk management information, records, data, advice or   HB3212- 20 -LRB104 10230 RTM 20304 b1    communications from or with respect to any insurer of the 2    public body or any intergovernmental risk management 3    association or self insurance pool of which the public 4    body is a member.5        (13) Conciliation of complaints of discrimination in 6    the sale or rental of housing, when closed meetings are 7    authorized by the law or ordinance prescribing fair 8    housing practices and creating a commission or 9    administrative agency for their enforcement.10        (14) Informant sources, the hiring or assignment of 11    undercover personnel or equipment, or ongoing, prior or 12    future criminal investigations, when discussed by a public 13    body with criminal investigatory responsibilities.14        (15) Professional ethics or performance when 15    considered by an advisory body appointed to advise a 16    licensing or regulatory agency on matters germane to the 17    advisory body's field of competence.18        (16) Self evaluation, practices and procedures or 19    professional ethics, when meeting with a representative of 20    a statewide association of which the public body is a 21    member.22        (17) The recruitment, credentialing, discipline or 23    formal peer review of physicians or other health care 24    professionals, or for the discussion of matters protected 25    under the federal Patient Safety and Quality Improvement 26    Act of 2005, and the regulations promulgated thereunder,   HB3212- 21 -LRB104 10230 RTM 20304 b1    including 42 C.F.R. Part 3 (73 FR 70732), or the federal 2    Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 3    1996, and the regulations promulgated thereunder, 4    including 45 C.F.R. Parts 160, 162, and 164, by a 5    hospital, or other institution providing medical care, 6    that is operated by the public body.7        (18) Deliberations for decisions of the Prisoner 8    Review Board.9        (19) Review or discussion of applications received 10    under the Experimental Organ Transplantation Procedures 11    Act.12        (20) The classification and discussion of matters 13    classified as confidential or continued confidential by 14    the State Government Suggestion Award Board.15        (21) Discussion of minutes of meetings lawfully closed 16    under this Act, whether for purposes of approval by the 17    body of the minutes or semi-annual review of the minutes 18    as mandated by Section 2.06.19        (22) Deliberations for decisions of the State 20    Emergency Medical Services Disciplinary Review Board.21        (23) The operation by a municipality of a municipal 22    utility or the operation of a municipal power agency or 23    municipal natural gas agency when the discussion involves 24    (i) contracts relating to the purchase, sale, or delivery 25    of electricity or natural gas or (ii) the results or 26    conclusions of load forecast studies.  HB3212- 22 -LRB104 10230 RTM 20304 b1        (24) Meetings of a residential health care facility 2    resident sexual assault and death review team or the 3    Executive Council under the Abuse Prevention Review Team 4    Act.5        (25) Meetings of an independent team of experts under 6    Brian's Law. 7        (26) Meetings of a mortality review team appointed 8    under the Department of Juvenile Justice Mortality Review 9    Team Act. 10        (27) (Blank). 11        (28) Correspondence and records (i) that may not be 12    disclosed under Section 11-9 of the Illinois Public Aid 13    Code or (ii) that pertain to appeals under Section 11-8 of 14    the Illinois Public Aid Code. 15        (29) Meetings between internal or external auditors 16    and governmental audit committees, finance committees, and 17    their equivalents, when the discussion involves internal 18    control weaknesses, identification of potential fraud risk 19    areas, known or suspected frauds, and fraud interviews 20    conducted in accordance with generally accepted auditing 21    standards of the United States of America.22        (30) (Blank). 23        (31) Meetings and deliberations for decisions of the 24    Concealed Carry Licensing Review Board under the Firearm 25    Concealed Carry Act. 26        (32) Meetings between the Regional Transportation   HB3212- 23 -LRB104 10230 RTM 20304 b1    Authority Board and its Service Boards when the discussion 2    involves review by the Regional Transportation Authority 3    Board of employment contracts under Section 28d of the 4    Metropolitan Transit Authority Act and Sections 3A.18 and 5    3B.26 of the Regional Transportation Authority Act.6        (33) Those meetings or portions of meetings of the 7    advisory committee and peer review subcommittee created 8    under Section 320 of the Illinois Controlled Substances 9    Act during which specific controlled substance prescriber, 10    dispenser, or patient information is discussed.11        (34) Meetings of the Tax Increment Financing Reform 12    Task Force under Section 2505-800 of the Department of 13    Revenue Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 14        (35) Meetings of the group established to discuss 15    Medicaid capitation rates under Section 5-30.8 of the 16    Illinois Public Aid Code. 17        (36) Those deliberations or portions of deliberations 18    for decisions of the Illinois Gaming Board in which there 19    is discussed any of the following: (i) personal, 20    commercial, financial, or other information obtained from 21    any source that is privileged, proprietary, confidential, 22    or a trade secret; or (ii) information specifically 23    exempted from the disclosure by federal or State law.24        (37) Deliberations for decisions of the Illinois Law 25    Enforcement Training Standards Board, the Certification 26    Review Panel, and the Illinois State Police Merit Board   HB3212- 24 -LRB104 10230 RTM 20304 b1    regarding certification and decertification. 2        (38) Meetings of the Ad Hoc Statewide Domestic 3    Violence Fatality Review Committee of the Illinois 4    Criminal Justice Information Authority Board that occur in 5    closed executive session under subsection (d) of Section 6    35 of the Domestic Violence Fatality Review Act. 7        (39) Meetings of the regional review teams under 8    subsection (a) of Section 75 of the Domestic Violence 9    Fatality Review Act. 10        (40) Meetings of the Firearm Owner's Identification 11    Card Review Board under Section 10 of the Firearm Owners 12    Identification Card Act. 13        (41) Deliberations about action taken, or which could 14    be taken, pursuant to the Local Government Bankruptcy 15    Neutral Evaluation Act. 16    (d) Definitions. For purposes of this Section:17    "Employee" means a person employed by a public body whose 18relationship with the public body constitutes an 19employer-employee relationship under the usual common law 20rules, and who is not an independent contractor.21    "Public office" means a position created by or under the 22Constitution or laws of this State, the occupant of which is 23charged with the exercise of some portion of the sovereign 24power of this State. The term "public office" shall include 25members of the public body, but it shall not include 26organizational positions filled by members thereof, whether   HB3212- 25 -LRB104 10230 RTM 20304 b1established by law or by a public body itself, that exist to 2assist the body in the conduct of its business.3    "Quasi-adjudicative body" means an administrative body 4charged by law or ordinance with the responsibility to conduct 5hearings, receive evidence or testimony and make 6determinations based thereon, but does not include local 7electoral boards when such bodies are considering petition 8challenges.9    (e) Final action. No final action may be taken at a closed 10meeting. Final action shall be preceded by a public recital of 11the nature of the matter being considered and other 12information that will inform the public of the business being 13conducted. 14(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-520, eff. 8-20-21; 15102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-311, eff. 167-28-23; 103-626, eff. 1-1-25.) 17    Section 85. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 18changing Section 7.5 as follows: 19    (5 ILCS 140/7.5)20    Sec. 7.5. Statutory exemptions. To the extent provided for 21by the statutes referenced below, the following shall be 22exempt from inspection and copying:23        (a) All information determined to be confidential 24    under Section 4002 of the Technology Advancement and   HB3212- 26 -LRB104 10230 RTM 20304 b1    Development Act.2        (b) Library circulation and order records identifying 3    library users with specific materials under the Library 4    Records Confidentiality Act.5        (c) Applications, related documents, and medical 6    records received by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 7    Procedures Board and any and all documents or other 8    records prepared by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 9    Procedures Board or its staff relating to applications it 10    has received.11        (d) Information and records held by the Department of 12    Public Health and its authorized representatives relating 13    to known or suspected cases of sexually transmitted 14    infection or any information the disclosure of which is 15    restricted under the Illinois Sexually Transmitted 16    Infection Control Act.17        (e) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 18    under Section 30 of the Radon Industry Licensing Act.19        (f) Firm performance evaluations under Section 55 of 20    the Architectural, Engineering, and Land Surveying 21    Qualifications Based Selection Act.22        (g) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 23    and exempted under Section 50 of the Illinois Prepaid 24    Tuition Act.25        (h) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 26    under the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act, and   HB3212- 27 -LRB104 10230 RTM 20304 b1    records of any lawfully created State or local inspector 2    general's office that would be exempt if created or 3    obtained by an Executive Inspector General's office under 4    that Act.5        (i) Information contained in a local emergency energy 6    plan submitted to a municipality in accordance with a 7    local emergency energy plan ordinance that is adopted 8    under Section 11-21.5-5 of the Illinois Municipal Code.9        (j) Information and data concerning the distribution 10    of surcharge moneys collected and remitted by carriers 11    under the Emergency Telephone System Act.12        (k) Law enforcement officer identification information 13    or driver identification information compiled by a law 14    enforcement agency or the Department of Transportation 15    under Section 11-212 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.16        (l) Records and information provided to a residential 17    health care facility resident sexual assault and death 18    review team or the Executive Council under the Abuse 19    Prevention Review Team Act.20        (m) Information provided to the predatory lending 21    database created pursuant to Article 3 of the Residential 22    Real Property Disclosure Act, except to the extent 23    authorized under that Article.24        (n) Defense budgets and petitions for certification of 25    compensation and expenses for court appointed trial 26    counsel as provided under Sections 10 and 15 of the   HB3212- 28 -LRB104 10230 RTM 20304 b1    Capital Crimes Litigation Act (repealed). This subsection 2    (n) shall apply until the conclusion of the trial of the 3    case, even if the prosecution chooses not to pursue the 4    death penalty prior to trial or sentencing.5        (o) Information that is prohibited from being 6    disclosed under Section 4 of the Illinois Health and 7    Hazardous Substances Registry Act.8        (p) Security portions of system safety program plans, 9    investigation reports, surveys, schedules, lists, data, or 10    information compiled, collected, or prepared by or for the 11    Department of Transportation under Sections 2705-300 and 12    2705-616 of the Department of Transportation Law of the 13    Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, the Regional 14    Transportation Authority under Section 2.11 of the 15    Regional Transportation Authority Act, or the St. Clair 16    County Transit District under the Bi-State Transit Safety 17    Act (repealed). 18        (q) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 19    Personnel Record Review Act. 20        (r) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 21    Illinois School Student Records Act. 22        (s) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 23    under Section 5-108 of the Public Utilities Act. 24        (t) (Blank). 25        (u) Records and information provided to an independent 26    team of experts under the Developmental Disability and   HB3212- 29 -LRB104 10230 RTM 20304 b1    Mental Health Safety Act (also known as Brian's Law). 2        (v) Names and information of people who have applied 3    for or received Firearm Owner's Identification Cards under 4    the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act or applied for 5    or received a concealed carry license under the Firearm 6    Concealed Carry Act, unless otherwise authorized by the 7    Firearm Concealed Carry Act; and databases under the 8    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, records of the Concealed 9    Carry Licensing Review Board under the Firearm Concealed 10    Carry Act, and law enforcement agency objections under the 11    Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 12        (v-5) Records of the Firearm Owner's Identification 13    Card Review Board that are exempted from disclosure under 14    Section 10 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.15        (w) Personally identifiable information which is 16    exempted from disclosure under subsection (g) of Section 17    19.1 of the Toll Highway Act.18        (x) Information which is exempted from disclosure 19    under Section 5-1014.3 of the Counties Code or Section 20    8-11-21 of the Illinois Municipal Code. 21        (y) Confidential information under the Adult 22    Protective Services Act and its predecessor enabling 23    statute, the Elder Abuse and Neglect Act, including 24    information about the identity and administrative finding 25    against any caregiver of a verified and substantiated 26    decision of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of   HB3212- 30 -LRB104 10230 RTM 20304 b1    an eligible adult maintained in the Registry established 2    under Section 7.5 of the Adult Protective Services Act. 3        (z) Records and information provided to a fatality 4    review team or the Illinois Fatality Review Team Advisory 5    Council under Section 15 of the Adult Protective Services 6    Act. 7        (aa) Information which is exempted from disclosure 8    under Section 2.37 of the Wildlife Code. 9        (bb) Information which is or was prohibited from 10    disclosure by the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 11        (cc) Recordings made under the Law Enforcement 12    Officer-Worn Body Camera Act, except to the extent 13    authorized under that Act.14        (dd) Information that is prohibited from being 15    disclosed under Section 45 of the Condominium and Common 16    Interest Community Ombudsperson Act. 17        (ee) Information that is exempted from disclosure 18    under Section 30.1 of the Pharmacy Practice Act. 19        (ff) Information that is exempted from disclosure 20    under the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. 21        (gg) Information that is prohibited from being 22    disclosed under Section 7-603.5 of the Illinois Vehicle 23    Code. 24        (hh) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 25    Section 1A-16.7 of the Election Code. 26        (ii) Information which is exempted from disclosure   HB3212- 31 -LRB104 10230 RTM 20304 b1    under Section 2505-800 of the Department of Revenue Law of 2    the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 3        (jj) Information and reports that are required to be 4    submitted to the Department of Labor by registering day 5    and temporary labor service agencies but are exempt from 6    disclosure under subsection (a-1) of Section 45 of the Day 7    and Temporary Labor Services Act. 8        (kk) Information prohibited from disclosure under the 9    Seizure and Forfeiture Reporting Act. 10        (ll) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 11    and exempted under Section 5-30.8 of the Illinois Public 12    Aid Code. 13        (mm) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 14    Section 4.2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 15        (nn) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 16    Section 70 of the Higher Education Student Assistance Act. 17        (oo) Communications, notes, records, and reports 18    arising out of a peer support counseling session 19    prohibited from disclosure under the First Responders 20    Suicide Prevention Act. 21        (pp) Names and all identifying information relating to 22    an employee of an emergency services provider or law 23    enforcement agency under the First Responders Suicide 24    Prevention Act. 25        (qq) Information and records held by the Department of 26    Public Health and its authorized representatives collected   HB3212- 32 -LRB104 10230 RTM 20304 b1    under the Reproductive Health Act. 2        (rr) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 3    the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 4        (ss) Data reported by an employer to the Department of 5    Human Rights pursuant to Section 2-108 of the Illinois 6    Human Rights Act.7        (tt) Recordings made under the Children's Advocacy 8    Center Act, except to the extent authorized under that 9    Act. 10        (uu) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 11    Section 50 of the Sexual Assault Evidence Submission Act. 12        (vv) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 13    subsections (f) and (j) of Section 5-36 of the Illinois 14    Public Aid Code. 15        (ww) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 16    Section 16.8 of the State Treasurer Act. 17        (xx) Information that is exempt from disclosure or 18    information that shall not be made public under the 19    Illinois Insurance Code. 20        (yy) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 21    the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act.22        (zz) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 23    the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 24        (aaa) Information prohibited from being disclosed 25    under Section 1-167 of the Illinois Pension Code. 26        (bbb) Information that is prohibited from disclosure   HB3212- 33 -LRB104 10230 RTM 20304 b1    by the Illinois Police Training Act and the Illinois State 2    Police Act. 3        (ccc) Records exempt from disclosure under Section 4    2605-304 of the Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 5    Administrative Code of Illinois. 6        (ddd) Information prohibited from being disclosed 7    under Section 35 of the Address Confidentiality for 8    Victims of Domestic Violence, Sexual Assault, Human 9    Trafficking, or Stalking Act. 10        (eee) Information prohibited from being disclosed 11    under subsection (b) of Section 75 of the Domestic 12    Violence Fatality Review Act. 13        (fff) Images from cameras under the Expressway Camera 14    Act. This subsection (fff) is inoperative on and after 15    July 1, 2025. 16        (ggg) Information prohibited from disclosure under 17    paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 14 of the Nurse 18    Agency Licensing Act. 19        (hhh) Information submitted to the Illinois State 20    Police in an affidavit or application for an assault 21    weapon endorsement, assault weapon attachment endorsement, 22    .50 caliber rifle endorsement, or .50 caliber cartridge 23    endorsement under the Firearm Owners Identification Card 24    Act. 25        (iii) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 50 of 26    the School Safety Drill Act.   HB3212- 34 -LRB104 10230 RTM 20304 b1        (jjj) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 2    30 of the Insurance Data Security Law. 3        (kkk) Confidential business information prohibited 4    from disclosure under Section 45 of the Paint Stewardship 5    Act. 6        (lll) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 7    2-3.196 of the School Code. 8        (mmm) Information prohibited from being disclosed 9    under subsection (e) of Section 1-129 of the Illinois 10    Power Agency Act. 11        (nnn) Materials received by the Department of Commerce 12    and Economic Opportunity that are confidential under the 13    Music and Musicians Tax Credit and Jobs Act. 14        (ooo) (nnn) Data or information provided pursuant to 15    Section 20 of the Statewide Recycling Needs and Assessment 16    Act. 17        (ppp) (nnn) Information that is exempt from disclosure 18    under Section 28-11 of the Lawful Health Care Activity 19    Act. 20        (qqq) (nnn) Information that is exempt from disclosure 21    under Section 7-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. 22        (rrr) (mmm) Information prohibited from being 23    disclosed under Section 4-2 of the Uniform Money 24    Transmission Modernization Act. 25        (sss) (nnn) Information exempt from disclosure under 26    Section 40 of the Student-Athlete Endorsement Rights Act.  HB3212- 35 -LRB104 10230 RTM 20304 b1        (ttt) All records and information prohibited from 2    being disclosed, inspected, or copied by the Local 3    Government Bankruptcy Neutral Evaluation Act. 4(Source: P.A. 102-36, eff. 6-25-21; 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 5102-292, eff. 1-1-22; 102-520, eff. 8-20-21; 102-559, eff. 68-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-946, eff. 7-1-22; 7102-1042, eff. 6-3-22; 102-1116, eff. 1-10-23; 103-8, eff. 86-7-23; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 103-142, eff. 1-1-24; 103-372, 9eff. 1-1-24; 103-472, eff. 8-1-24; 103-508, eff. 8-4-23; 10103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-592, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 117-1-24; 103-636, eff. 7-1-24; 103-724, eff. 1-1-25; 103-786, 12eff. 8-7-24; 103-859, eff. 8-9-24; 103-991, eff. 8-9-24; 13103-1049, eff. 8-9-24; revised 11-26-24.) 14    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.